Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.10.050

Amendment of articles of incorporation before issuance of shares.

If a corporation has not yet issued shares, its board of directors, or incorporators if initial directors were not named in the articles of incorporation and have not been elected, may adopt one or more amendments to the corporation's articles of incorporation.

[ 1989 c 165 s 124.]